Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 10. Foreign Limited Liability Companies.

§79-29-1001.
Law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of this state, the laws of the state or country or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability company is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its members, and a foreign limited liability company may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

A foreign limited liability company shall be subject to Section 79-29-117 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1001 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the laws governing the organization and internal affairs of a foreign limited liability company. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

“Derivative proceeding” as meaning a civil suit in the right of a foreign limited liability company, to the extent provided in this article, see § 79-29-103.

§79-29-1002.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1002. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 68; Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

Former § 79-29-1002 was entitled: Registration; application to registered foreign limited liability companies. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1003.

§79-29-1003.
Registrations; application to register foreign limited liability companies.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited liability company, including a foreign limited liability company formed to render professional services, shall register with the Secretary of State. In order to register, a foreign limited liability company shall deliver the application for registration of the foreign limited liability company to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing, signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state, country or other jurisdiction of its formation who is either a member, manager or officer of the foreign limited liability company and setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited liability company which must meet the requirements of Section 79-29-1007 and, if different, the name under which it proposes to transact business in this state which must meet the requirements of Section 79-29-1007;

The state or other jurisdiction and date of its formation and a statement that, as of the date of filing, the foreign limited liability company validly exists as a limited liability company under the laws of the jurisdiction of its formation;

The information required by Section 79-35-13;

[Reserved]

The date on which the foreign limited liability company first did, or intends to do, business in the State of Mississippi;

The address of the office required to be maintained in the state or other jurisdiction of its formation by the laws of that state or other jurisdiction or, if not so required, the address of the principal office of the foreign limited liability company;

If the foreign limited liability company is to have a specific date of dissolution, the latest date upon which the foreign limited liability company is to dissolve; and

Any other matters the manager or members determine to include therein.

The person signing the application shall state the person’s name, the capacity in which the person signs and the street and mailing address of the person beneath or opposite the person’s signature. A document required or permitted to be delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter which contains a copy of a signature, however made, is acceptable for filing by the Secretary of State.

The foreign limited liability company shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence, or a document of similar import, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other public official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is formed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 119, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

A former § 79-29-1003 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 69; Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to issuance of registration. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1005.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, typographical errors in this section were corrected as follows: in the section heading, the word “liability” was inserted; and in (1)(g), the word “foreign” was inserted preceding the first reference to “limited liability company.”

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (1), rewrote (b), which formerly read: “The name and street and mailing address of the registered agent for service of process on the foreign limited liability company which the foreign limited liability company has elected to appoint and who meets the requirements of Section 79-29-113(1)(b)” and deleted (d), which read: “A statement that the Secretary of State is appointed the registered agent of the foreign limited liability company for service of process if the registered agent’s authority has been revoked or if the registered agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence” and reserved the paragraph designator.

§79-29-1004.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1004. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1004 was entitled: Name. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1007.

§79-29-1005.
Issuance of registration.

If the Secretary of State finds that an application for registration meets the requirements of Sections 79-29-1003 and 79-29-1007 and all requisite fees as provided in Section 79-29-1203 have been paid, the Secretary of State shall:

Certify that the application has been filed in the Secretary of State’s office by endorsing upon the signed application the word “Filed” and the date and time of the filing.This endorsement is conclusive evidence of the date and time of its filing in the absence of actual fraud;

File the application; and

Return a copy to the person who delivered it for filing or that person’s representative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1005 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 71; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to changes and amendments to statements in the registration. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1009.

§79-29-1006.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1006. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 72; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

Former § 79-29-1006 was entitled: Cancellation of registration. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1011.

§79-29-1007.
Name.

A foreign limited liability company shall register with the Secretary of State under any name, whether or not it is the name under which it is registered in its state of organization, that includes the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.” or “LLC” and that could be registered by a domestic limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1007 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the transaction of business without registration. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1013.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1023-1036.

§79-29-1008.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1008. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1008 was entitled: Transactions not constituting transacting business. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1015.

§79-29-1009.
Changes and amendments.

If any statement, arrangements or other facts described in the application for registration of a foreign limited liability company have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign limited liability company shall promptly amend the application by delivering to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of amendment that includes the amendment to the certificate correcting such statement, signed and acknowledged by a person authorized to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation who is either a member, manager or officer of the foreign limited liability company, together with a fee as set forth in Section 79-29-1203.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1009 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to action by the Attorney General. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1017.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, a typographical error near the end of the section was corrected by inserting the word “foreign” preceding “limited liability company, together with a fee.”

§79-29-1010.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1010. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 76, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1010 was entitled: Execution; liability. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1019.

§79-29-1011.
Cancellation of registration.

A foreign limited liability company registered under this chapter shall cancel its registration upon completion of the winding-up of its affairs.

A foreign limited liability company may cancel its registration whenever it ceases transacting business in this state.

Registration is canceled by delivering to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of cancellation signed by a person authorized to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation and paying the fee set forth in Section 79-29-1203.

A cancellation revokes the authority of the registered agent for service of process designated pursuant to Section 79-29-1003 and operates as a consent that the Secretary of State may accept service of process on the foreign limited liability company with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1013.
Transaction of business without registration.

A foreign limited liability company transacting business in this state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited liability company to register in this state does not:

Impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited liability company;

Impair the right of any other party to the contract to maintain any action, suit or proceeding on the contract; or

Prevent the foreign limited liability company from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.

A member of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations or liabilities of the foreign limited liability company solely by reason of the foreign limited liability company having transacted business in this state without registration.

By transacting business in this state without registration, a foreign limited liability company appoints the Secretary of State as its registered agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Circuit court properly dismissed a complaint filed by a Mississippi limited liability company (LLC) and denied its motion to substitute the parties because there were two LLCs—one was registered as a Louisiana LLC and the other as a Mississippi LLC—and, while the Mississippi LLC had capacity to file suit, it lacked standing to assert the breach of contract claim where it was not a party to the subject contract with the city, was not a legal entity when the work was performed under the contract, and was not a real party in interest that could be substituted as a party, and the Louisiana LLC had no statutory authority to file suit until years after the applicable three-year statute-of-limitations period had run. Nungesser Indus. LLC v. City of Jackson, — So.3d —, 2019 Miss. App. LEXIS 587 (Miss. Ct. App. Dec. 10, 2019).

Issue of whether a limited liability company (LLC) had standing had been waived, expressly or impliedly, by the parties because the question was not an issue of standing but of capacity, and the LLC’s lack of capacity had been cured; the LLC reregistered as a foreign limited liability company in good standing with the Mississippi Secretary of State, and all parties accommodated re-registration pending appeal and consented to supplement the record regarding the LLC’s continued existence. Jourdan River Estates, LLC v. Favre, 278 So.3d 1135, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 345 (Miss. 2019).

§79-29-1015.
Transactions not constituting transacting business.

The following activities of a foreign limited liability company, among others, do not constitute transacting business in this state within the meaning of this article:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of its members or managers or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the foreign limited liability company’s own securities or interests or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities or interests;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts and holding, protecting and maintaining property so acquired;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature; or

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

A foreign limited liability company shall not be considered to be transacting business in this state solely because it:

Is a shareholder in a corporation or a foreign corporation that transacts business in this state;

Is a limited partner of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership that is transacting business in this state; or

Is a member or manager of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company that is transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contracts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability company to service of process or taxation in this state or to regulation under any other law of this state.

A foreign limited liability company which is a general partner of any general or limited partnership, which partnership is transacting business in this state, is hereby declared to be transacting business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1017.
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited liability company from transacting business in this state in violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Power of state to subject foreign corporation to jurisdiction of its courts on sole ground that corporation committed tort within state.
25 A.L.R.2d 1202.

§79-29-1019.
Execution; liability.

Section 79-29-207(4) shall be applicable to foreign limited liability companies as if they were domestic limited liability companies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1021.
Administrative revocation of registration of foreign limited liability company.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-29-1023 to administratively revoke the registration of a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state if:

The foreign limited liability company does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any fees imposed by this chapter or other law;

The foreign limited liability company does not deliver its annual report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The foreign limited liability company is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The foreign limited liability company does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned;

The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the Secretary of State or other public official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign limited liability company is organized stating that it has been dissolved or ceased to exist as the result of a merger; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign limited liability company to the Secretary of State pursuant to this chapter.

The Secretary of State may not administratively revoke a registration of a foreign limited liability company unless the Secretary of State sends the foreign limited liability company notice of the administrative revocation under Section 79-29-1023, at least sixty (60) days before its effective date, by a record addressed to its registered agent, or to the foreign limited liability company if the foreign limited liability company fails to appoint and maintain a proper agent in this state.The notice must specify the cause for the administrative revocation of the registration.The authority of the foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state ceases on the effective date of the administrative revocation unless the foreign limited liability company cures the failure before that date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1023.
Administrative revocation of registration, procedure and effect.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-29-1021 for administrative revocation of registration, the Secretary of State shall serve the foreign limited liability company with written notice of the determination under Section 79-35-13, except that such determination may be served by first-class mail.

If the foreign limited liability company does not correct each ground for administrative revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after the service of the notice, the Secretary of State may administratively revoke the foreign limited liability company’s registration by signing a certificate of administrative revocation that recites the ground or grounds for administrative revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate of administrative revocation and serve the foreign limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of administrative revocation under Section 79-35-13, except that such certificate of administrative revocation may be served by first-class mail.

The authority of a foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate of administrative revocation.

The Secretary of State’s administrative revocation of a foreign limited liability company’s registration appoints the Secretary of State the foreign limited liability company’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign limited liability company was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the Secretary of State under this subsection is service on the foreign limited liability company. Upon receipt of process and the payment of the fee specified in Section 79-35-13, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign limited liability company at the office of its registered agent, or if the agent has resigned or cannot be located, at its principal office shown in its most recent communication received from the foreign limited liability company stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for registration of foreign limited liability company.

Administrative revocation of a foreign limited liability company’s registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability company.

The administrative revocation of the registration of a foreign limited liability company shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such foreign limited liability company or prevent the foreign limited liability company from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court of this state.

A member, manager or officer of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations or liabilities of such foreign limited liability company solely by reason of the administrative revocation of the registration of a foreign limited liability company.

A foreign limited liability company whose registration has been administratively revoked may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until such foreign limited liability company’s registration has been reinstated. An action, suit or proceeding may not be maintained in any court of this state by any successor or assignee of such foreign limited liability company on any right, claim or demand arising out of the transaction of business by a foreign limited liability company after the administrative revocation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 120, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a typographical error in subsection (6) of this section by substituting “...shall not impair the validity of any contract...” for “...shall not impair the validity on any contract...”. The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” following “Section” in (1), (2), and (4).

Issue of whether a limited liability company (LLC) had standing had been waived, expressly or impliedly, by the parties because the question was not an issue of standing but of capacity, and the LLC’s lack of capacity had been cured; the LLC reregistered as a foreign limited liability company in good standing with the Mississippi Secretary of State, and all parties accommodated re-registration pending appeal and consented to supplement the record regarding the LLC’s continued existence. Jourdan River Estates, LLC v. Favre, 278 So.3d 1135, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 345 (Miss. 2019).

§79-29-1025.
Administrative revocation of registration, appeal and reinstatement.

A foreign limited liability company whose registration is administratively revoked under Section 79-29-1021 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of such administrative revocation. The application must:

Recite the name of the foreign limited liability company and the effective date of the administrative revocation;

State that the ground or grounds for administrative revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State that the foreign limited liability company’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-29-1007.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the registration of a foreign limited liability company, prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites this determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate of reinstatement, and serve the foreign limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of reinstatement under Section 79-35-13, except that such certificate may be served by first-class mail.

When the reinstatement is effective:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation;

Any liability incurred by the foreign limited liability company or a member after the administrative revocation and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative revocation had never occurred; and

The foreign limited liability company may resume carrying on its business as if the administrative revocation had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 121, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” following “Section” near the end of (2).

§79-29-1027.
Administrative revocation of registration, denial of reinstatement; further review.

If the Secretary of State denies a foreign limited liability company’s application for reinstatement of the registration following administrative revocation, the Secretary of State shall serve the foreign limited liability company with a record that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The foreign limited liability company may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of the county where the foreign limited liability company is domiciled within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected.The foreign limited liability company appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the administrative revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of administrative revocation, the foreign limited liability company’s application for reinstatement and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the registration of the foreign limited liability company or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1029.
Certificate of authorization.

The Secretary of State, upon request and payment of the requisite fee, shall furnish to any person a certificate of authorization for a foreign limited liability company if the records filed in the Office of the Secretary of State show that the foreign limited liability company has registered as a foreign limited liability company, the registration has not been administratively revoked, and a certificate of cancellation has not been filed which has become effective.A certificate of authorization must state:

The foreign limited liability company’s name and any alternate name adopted under Section 79-29-1003(1)(a) for use in this state;

That the foreign limited liability company is authorized to transact business in this state;

Whether all fees due under this chapter to the Secretary of State have been paid;

Whether the foreign limited liability company’s most recent annual report required by Section 79-29-215 has been filed with the Secretary of State;

Whether a certificate of administrative revocation of registration has been filed;

Whether a certificate of cancellation of registration as a foreign limited liability company has been filed for the limited liability company; and

Other facts of record in the Office of the Secretary of State which are specified by the person requesting the certificate.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of authorization issued by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence that the foreign limited liability company is authorized to transact business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.